Illinois, session 104th, SB881.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Farmer Equity Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 72/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Farmer Equity Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-1039, eff. 8-23-18.)